California statutes. Education Code
(1) Transmit that recommendation together with the petition filed under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 35721, or with the resolution filed under subdivision (c) of Section 35721, if any, to the state board for hearing as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 35750).

(2) Transmit the petition to the state board and order the reorganization granted if the requirements of Section 35709 are
 satisfied.

(3) Transmit the petition to the state board and order that an election be held if the requirements of Section 35710 are satisfied.

(b) An action of the county committee that results in a transmittal described in either paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) may be appealed to the state board pursuant to Section 35710.5 or 35711.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 301, Sec. 6.   (SB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

35723.

When a county committee selects an area for study for possible recommendation for reorganization which includes territory of one or more school districts under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools of another county, the county committee shall so notify the members of the county committee of such other county. Thereafter, the members of the county committee of such other county shall be notified by mail of each public hearing or meeting of the county committee at which the proposed reorganization will be considered at least 10 days prior to the day of such hearing or meeting.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35724.

If plans and recommendations adopted by a county committee propose changes in the boundaries or status of school districts under the jurisdiction of the superintendent of any adjacent county, the county committee of each such adjacent county shall be requested in writing to concur in the plans and recommendations.

If the county committee of an adjacent county concurs in the plans and recommendations, the concurrence shall accompany the recommendations transmitted to the State Board of Education.

If the county committee of an adjacent county fails to respond to the request for concurrence within 90 days of the date of the request, such failure shall be deemed to be a concurrence in the plans and recommendations.

If a county committee of an adjacent county does not concur in the plans and recommendations, it shall so notify the other county committee in writing and accompany the notification with plans and recommendations for the reorganization of school districts of its county including territory that would be affected by the plans and recommendations of the other county committee. After 60 days from the notification of nonconcurrence, if the county committees are still unable to agree upon plans and recommendations for reorganization of the territory, the county committees, or any of them, may submit plans and recommendations to the State Board of Education, and the board may approve or reject the plans, or any of them, in the same manner as other plans and recommendations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Contents of Plans and Recommendations [35730. - 35738.]

35730.

The plans and recommendations, in connection with the proposed formation of a new unified school district to include within its boundaries a chartered city, may provide that the establishment and existence of the governing board of the district shall be governed by the charter of the city and not exclusively by general law. Upon adoption of plans and recommendations containing such provision, the establishment and existence of the governing board of the district shall thenceforth be governed exclusively by the city charter and the board shall be a city board of education of a chartered city. In the absence of such a recommendation, the proposed new unified district shall be governed by general law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35730.1.

Any reorganization of a school district with more than 500,000 pupils in average daily attendance shall require that each new district created meets the following conditions:

(a) Socioeconomic diversity.

(b) Geographical compactness.

(c) Equity of resource distribution.

(d) Compliance with Crawford v. Board of Education, 17 Cal. 3d 280, and the terms of the consent decree in Rodriquez v. Los Angeles Unified School District, Consent Decree No. C-611358.

(e) Preservation of the policies used by magnet schools, charter schools, site-based management initiatives, and the LEARN program as those policies already exist in practice or pursuant to law.

(f) Compliance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(g) Compliance with the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1971), as amended.

(h) The formation of the new school districts does not result in the diminution of minority protections.

(i) The maintenance of the conditions of all collective bargaining agreements until their expirations.

(j) Recognition of the existing retiree health, dental, and vision care benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 412, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35731.

In any proposal for unification, plans and recommendations may include a provision for a governing board of seven members. In the absence of such a provision, any proposed new district shall have a governing board of five members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35732.

Plans and recommendations may include a provision specifying the territory in which the election to reorganize the school districts will be held. In the absence of such a provision, the election shall be held only in the territory proposed for reorganization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35733.

Whenever the recommendation is to divide the entire territory of an existing school district into two or more separate school districts, the recommendation may provide that the plans and recommendations be voted upon as a single proposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35734.

The plans and recommendations may include a provision for trustee areas that provide for representation in accordance with population and geographic factors of the entire area of the district. Any provision of that kind shall also specify the boundaries of the proposed trustee areas and shall specify whether members of the governing board shall be elected by the registered voters of the entire school district or by only the registered voters of that particular trustee area. A proposal for trustee areas shall be considered as an inherent part of the proposal and not as a separate proposition.

In the absence of a provision for trustee areas, the proposed new district shall have a governing board elected by the registered voters of the entire district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

35735.

(a) Each proposal for the reorganization of school districts shall include a computation of the local control funding formula entitlement determined pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, for the districts. That computation shall be an integral part of the proposal, and shall not be considered separately from the proposal. The funding computations for the reorganized school districts shall be made consistent with the calculations established in this article, and shall be based on the current information available for each affected school district for the second principal apportionment period for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(b) The county superintendent of schools shall compute the local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to this article for a school district involved in an action to reorganize.

(c) (1) For a former school district that has been wholly included in more than one new or acquiring district, the county superintendent of schools with jurisdiction over the reorganized school district shall compute the local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to this article. As part of this computation, and except as otherwise provided in this article, the county superintendent of schools may determine both of the following:

(2) (A) The prior year funded average daily attendance as of the second principal apportionment from each affected school district that will be served by each
 reorganized school district.

(B) Consistent with paragraph (1), the division of all of the following types of funding attributed to a former district when all of the territory of that former district is made part of two or more new or acquiring districts:

(i) Categorical program funding provided pursuant to subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 42238.02, paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03, and subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03.

(ii) Economic recovery target payments computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.025.

(iii) Necessary small school allowances provided for minimum state aid pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03, except that in no case shall the
 allowance attributed to a single necessary small elementary or necessary small high school be divided among more than one new or acquiring district.

(3) The funding calculated pursuant to this subdivision shall be incorporated by the Superintendent into the new or acquiring district’s calculations as if it were a former district that is wholly included in the new district, provided that the required information is submitted to the Superintendent within the timeframe established by the Superintendent. If the county superintendent of schools does not provide all of the information in paragraphs (1) and (2), the funding shall not be included in the new or acquiring district’s calculations.

(d) For all actions to reorganize, except for those actions approved pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 35710, or appealed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35710, Section 35710.5, or
 Section 35711, the Superintendent shall compute the local control funding formula entitlement for a reorganized school district pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.

(e) The Superintendent may make adjustments to the local control funding formula entitlements computed pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), if those adjustments are necessary to cause those entitlements to be consistent with this article.

(f) For purposes of this article, a lapse pursuant to Section 35780.1 shall be considered an action to reorganize pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 35511.

(g) Any costs incurred by the county superintendent of schools in preparing reports pursuant to this section or Sections 35735.1 to 35735.9, inclusive, may be billed to the affected school districts on a proportionate
 basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 5.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35735.1.

For purposes of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02, reorganized districts shall have their percentages of unduplicated pupils calculated as follows:

(a) (1) For a new district in the first fiscal year of operation, include only the current fiscal year unduplicated pupil and enrollment counts used to establish the current fiscal year percentage.

(2) For a new district in the second fiscal year of operation, include only the current fiscal year and prior fiscal year unduplicated pupil and enrollment counts to establish the current fiscal year percentage.

(3) For a new district in the third and subsequent fiscal years of operation, include the current fiscal year, prior fiscal year, and second prior fiscal year unduplicated pupil and enrollment counts to establish the current fiscal year percentage.

(b) For an acquiring district in the first fiscal year of operation after the reorganization, retain the prior fiscal year and second prior fiscal year unduplicated pupil and enrollment counts from the fiscal years before the reorganization. For the current fiscal year and each subsequent fiscal year after reorganization, include the unduplicated pupil and enrollment counts for all pupils who are being served by the acquiring district.

(c) For the remaining portion of a divided district, the percentage calculation shall include the prior and second prior fiscal year unduplicated pupil and enrollment counts from the fiscal
 years before the reorganization. For the current and each subsequent fiscal year after reorganization, include only the unduplicated pupil and enrollment counts for the pupils who are being served by the remaining portion of the divided district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 7.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35735.2.

For purposes of subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 42238.02, paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03, and subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03, reorganized districts shall have categorical program funding determined as follows:

(a) (1) A new district shall retain the same amount of categorical funding received by each former district before the reorganization. A new district shall not retain any categorical funding received by divided districts before the reorganization.

(2) If the new district is composed wholly of former districts, it shall receive a reduction pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03
 only to the extent that the new district would have received a reduction in the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(3) If the new district is comprised of former districts and one or more divided districts, it shall receive a reduction pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 only to the extent that the former districts received a reduction in the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(b) (1) An acquiring district shall retain the same amount of categorical funding it received before the reorganization, plus the amount of categorical funding received by each former district before the reorganization. An acquiring district shall not retain any categorical funding received by divided districts before the reorganization.

(2) If the acquiring district is composed wholly of former districts, it shall
 receive a reduction pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 only to the extent that the acquiring district would have received a reduction in the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(3) If the acquiring district comprises a former district and one or more divided districts, it shall receive a reduction pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 only to the extent that the former district received a reduction in the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(c) (1) The remaining portion of a divided district shall retain the same amount of categorical funding it received before the reorganization.

(2) If a divided district received a reduction pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03, it shall continue to receive that reduction.

(d) If the reorganization includes a former district that has been wholly included in more than one new or acquiring districts, the categorical funding shall be determined pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35735.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 8.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35735.3.

(a) A new or acquiring district shall receive an economic recovery target payment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.025 that is equal to the sum of the amounts determined for each former district that was eligible to receive an economic recovery target payment pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.025 before the reorganization.

(b) The remaining portion of a divided district shall retain the same amount of economic recovery target funding pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.025 that it was eligible to receive before the reorganization.

(c) If the reorganization
 includes a former district that has been wholly included in more than one new or acquiring district, the economic recovery target funding shall be determined pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35735.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 9.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35735.4.

For purposes of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.03, a reorganized district shall be deemed to have a zero difference in the prior fiscal year if one of the following conditions is met:

(a) For a new district resulting from an action to reorganize pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511, each former district had a zero difference in the prior fiscal year.

(b) For a new district resulting from an action to reorganize pursuant to paragraph (4) subdivision (a) of Section 35511, the original district had a zero difference in the prior fiscal year.

(c) For an
 acquiring district affected by an action to reorganize taken pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 35511, the acquiring district has a zero difference in the prior fiscal year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 11.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35735.5.

(a) For a new or acquiring district that has reorganized pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511 or subdivision (b) of Section 35511, the funding amount per unit of average daily attendance pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 shall be calculated, as follows:

(1) If the reorganization took place before December 31, 2013, for each affected district:

(A) Blend the revenue limit pursuant to Section 35735.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013.

(B) Multiply the average daily attendance for the
 fiscal year two years before the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective by the per unit of average daily attendance amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03.

(C) Add the products determined in subparagraph (B) and divide by the sum of units of average daily attendance for the fiscal year two years before the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective for all affected districts.

(2) If the reorganization took place after December 31, 2013, for each affected district:

(A) Multiply the average daily attendance for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective by the per unit of average daily attendance amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph
 (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03.

(B) Add the products determined in subparagraph (A) and divide by the sum of units of average daily attendance for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective for all affected districts.

(3) (A) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), average daily attendance shall be the funded average daily attendance as of the second principal apportionment.

(B) If the reorganization includes a divided district, the following shall apply:

(i) For purposes of paragraph (1), the average daily attendance shall be estimated by the county office of education and reported to the department based on the units of average daily attendance to be served
 by the reorganized district.

(ii) For purposes of paragraph (2), the average daily attendance shall be estimated by the county office of education and reported to the department based on the units of average daily attendance to be served by the reorganized district in the first fiscal year the reorganization becomes effective. If no average daily attendance of the divided district is estimated to be served in the first fiscal year of the reorganization, the divided district’s funding shall not be included in the blending calculation made pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03.

(C) For purposes of paragraph (1) or (2), if the reorganization includes a former district that has been wholly included in more than one new or acquiring district, the average daily attendance shall be the average daily attendance reported pursuant to
 subdivision (c) of Section 35735.

(b) For a new district formed as a result of deunification pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511, the funding amount per unit of average daily attendance pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 shall be equal to the amount calculated for the original district for the fiscal year before the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 12.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35735.6.

(a) For a new or acquiring district that has reorganized pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511 or subdivision (b) of Section 35511, the funding amount per unit of average daily attendance pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03, shall be calculated as follows:

(1) If the reorganization took place before December 31, 2013, for each affected district:

(A) Multiply the average daily attendance for the fiscal year two years before the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective by the per unit of average daily attendance amount computed
 pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03.

(B) Add the products determined in subparagraph (A), and divide that sum by the sum of units of average daily attendance for the fiscal year two years immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective for all affected districts.

(C) No adjustment shall be made for paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 35735.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013.

(2) If the reorganization took place after December 31, 2013, for each affected district:

(A) Multiply the average daily attendance for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective by the per unit of average
 daily attendance amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03.

(B) Add the products determined in subparagraph (A), and divide by the sum of units of average daily attendance for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective for all affected school districts.

(3) (A) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), average daily attendance shall be the funded average daily attendance as of the second principal apportionment.

(B) If the reorganization includes a divided district, the following shall apply:

(i) For purposes of paragraph (1), the average daily attendance shall be estimated by the county office of education and
 reported to the department based on the units of average daily attendance to be served by the reorganized district.

(ii) For purposes of paragraph (2), the average daily attendance shall be estimated by the county office of education and reported to the department based on the units of average daily attendance to be served by the reorganized district in the fiscal year the first reorganization becomes effective. If no average daily attendance of the divided district is estimated to be served in the first fiscal year of the reorganization, the divided district’s funding shall not be included in the blending calculation made pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03.

(C) For purposes of paragraph (1) or (2), if the reorganization includes a former district that has been wholly included in more than one new or acquiring district, the average
 daily attendance shall be the average daily attendance reported pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35735.

(b) For a new district formed as a result of deunification pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511, the funding amount per unit of average daily attendance pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03 shall be equal to the amount calculated for the original district for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 13.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35735.7.

For a new or acquiring district that has reorganized pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511 or subdivision (b) of Section 35511, the funding amount per unit of average daily attendance pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 shall be calculated as follows:

(a) If the reorganization took place before December 31, 2013:

(1) For each affected district, divide the amount of funding received in the immediately preceding fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 as of the second principal apportionment by the units of average daily attendance for the fiscal year
 immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(2) For each affected district, multiply the amount determined in paragraph (1) by the average daily attendance for the fiscal year two years before the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(3) Add the products determined in paragraph (2), and divide that sum by the sum of the average daily attendance determined in paragraph (2) for all affected districts.

(b) If the reorganization took place after December 31, 2013:

(1) For each affected district, divide the amount of funding received in the immediately preceding fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 as of the second principal apportionment by the
 units of average daily attendance for the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(2) For each affected district, multiply the amount determined in paragraph (1) by the average daily attendance for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(3) Add the products determined in paragraph (2), and divide that sum by the sum of the average daily attendance determined in paragraph (2) for all affected districts.

(c) (1) For purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b), average daily attendance shall be the funded average daily attendance as of the second principal apportionment.

(2) If the reorganization includes a divided district,
 the following shall apply:

(A) For purposes of subdivision (a), the average daily attendance shall be estimated by the county office of education and reported to the department based on the units of average daily attendance to be served by the reorganized district.

(B) For purposes of subdivision (b), the average daily attendance shall be estimated by the county office of education and reported to the department based on the units of average daily attendance to be served by the reorganized district in the first fiscal year the reorganization becomes effective. If no average daily attendance of the divided district is estimated to be served in the first fiscal year of the reorganization, the divided district’s funding shall not be included in the blending calculation pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03.

(3) For purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b), if the reorganization includes a former district that has been wholly included in more than one new or acquiring district, the average daily attendance shall be the average daily attendance reported pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35735.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 14.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35735.8.

(a) For a new or acquiring district that has reorganized pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511 or subdivision (b) of Section 35511, the funding amount per unit of average daily attendance pursuant to Sections 42289 to 42289.5, inclusive, for purposes of determining funding pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 42283.02, shall be calculated as follows:

(1) If the reorganization took place before December 31, 2013, for each affected district:

(A) Multiply the average daily attendance for the fiscal year two years before the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective
 by the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42287 for the fiscal year two years before the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(B) Add the products determined in subparagraph (A), and divide that sum by the sum of units of average daily attendance for the fiscal year two years before the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective for all affected districts.

(C) Increase the amount determined in subparagraph (B) by the percentage calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which reorganization is to become effective.

(2) If the reorganization took place after December 31, 2013, for each affected district:

(A) Multiply the average daily attendance for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective by the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42287 for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(B) Add the products determined in subparagraph (A), and divide that sum by the sum of units of average daily attendance for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective for all affected districts.

(3) (A) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), average daily attendance shall be the funded average daily attendance as of the second principal apportionment.

(B) If the reorganization includes a divided district, both of the following shall apply:

(i) For purposes of paragraph (1), the average daily attendance shall be estimated by the county office of education and reported to the department based on the units of average daily attendance to be served by the reorganized district.

(ii) For purposes of paragraph (2), the average daily attendance shall be estimated by the county office of education and reported to the department based on the units of average daily attendance to be served by the reorganized district in the first year the reorganization becomes effective. If no average daily attendance of the divided district is estimated to be served in the first year of the reorganization, the divided district’s funding shall not be included in the blending calculation pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section
 42238.02.

(C) For purposes of paragraph (1) or (2), if the reorganization includes a former district that has been wholly included in more than one new or acquiring district, the average daily attendance shall be the average daily attendance reported pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35735.

(b) For a new district formed as a result of deunification pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511, the funding amount per unit of average daily attendance shall be equal to the amount calculated for the original district for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 15.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35735.9.

(a) For a new district or acquiring district that has reorganized pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511 or subdivision (b) of Section 35511, the funding amount per unit of average daily attendance pursuant to Sections 42289 to 42289.5, inclusive, for purposes of determining funding pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42283.03, shall be calculated as follows:

(1) If the reorganization took place before December 31, 2013, for each affected district:

(A) Multiply the average daily attendance for the fiscal year two years before the fiscal year in which the
 reorganization is to become effective by the amount per unit of average daily attendance that corresponds to the 2012–13 fiscal year funding amounts pursuant to Sections 42289 to 42289.5, inclusive, and Section 42238.146, as that section read on June 15, 2015.

(B) Add the products determined in subparagraph (A), and divide that sum by the sum of units of average daily attendance for the fiscal year two years before the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective for all affected districts.

(2) If the reorganization took place after December 31, 2013, for each affected district:

(A) Multiply the average daily attendance for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective by the amount per unit of average daily attendance that corresponds to
 the 2012–13 fiscal year funding amounts pursuant to Sections 42289 to 42289.5, inclusive, and Section 42238.146, as that section read on June 15, 2015.

(B) Add the products determined in subparagraph (A), and divide that sum by the sum of units of average daily attendance for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective for all affected districts.

(3) (A) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), average daily attendance shall be the funded average daily attendance as of the second principal apportionment.

(B) If the reorganization includes a divided district, the following shall apply:

(i) For purposes of paragraph (1), the average daily attendance shall be estimated by the
 county office of education and reported to the department based on the units of average daily attendance to be served by the reorganized district.

(ii) For purposes of paragraph (2), the average daily attendance shall be estimated by the county office of education and reported to the department based on the units of average daily attendance to be served by the reorganized district in the first fiscal year the reorganization becomes effective. If no average daily attendance of the divided district is estimated to be served in the first fiscal year of the reorganization, the divided district’s funding shall not be included in the blending calculation pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03.

(C) For purposes of paragraph (1) or (2), if the reorganization includes a former district that has been wholly included in more than one new or
 acquiring district, the average daily attendance shall be the average daily attendance reported pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35735.

(b) For a new district formed as a result of deunification pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 35511, the funding amount per unit of average daily attendance shall be equal to the amount calculated for the original district for the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 16.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35735.10.

For the purpose of determining funding pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03, the following shall apply to districts affected by reorganization pursuant to Section 35511 or a lapse pursuant to Section 35780.1:

(a) A new district shall receive the same amount of the 2012–13 fiscal year funding allowance provided for qualifying necessary small elementary schools and necessary small high schools received by each former district in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective if the former district has been wholly included in the new district.

(b) An
 acquiring district shall retain the same amount as the 2012–13 fiscal year funding allowance provided for its qualifying necessary small elementary schools and necessary small high schools in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective and any such allowance provided to a former district if the former district has been wholly included in the acquiring district.

(c) A divided district shall retain the same amount of the 2012–13 fiscal year funding allowance provided for its qualifying necessary small elementary schools and necessary small high schools in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the reorganization is to become effective.

(d) If the reorganization includes a former district that has been wholly included in more than one new or acquiring district, the necessary small school allowance
 for minimum state aid shall be determined pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35735.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 448, Sec. 17.   (SB 148)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35736.

Plans and recommendations may include a proposal for dividing the property, other than real property, and obligations of any school district proposed to be divided between two or more new or acquiring districts, or proposed to be partially included in one or more new or acquiring districts. As used in this section, “property” includes funds, cash on hand, and moneys due but uncollected on the date reorganization becomes effective for all purposes, and state apportionments based on average daily attendance earned in the year immediately preceding the date reorganization becomes effective for all purposes. In providing for this division, the plans and recommendations may consider the assessed valuation of each portion of the school district, the local control funding formula allocation pursuant to Section
 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, in each school district, the number of children of schoolage residing in each portion of the school district, the value and location of the school property, and other matters that may be deemed pertinent and equitable. Any such proposal shall be an integral part of the proposal and not a separate proposition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 29.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35736.5.

Sections 35735 to 35736, inclusive, shall only apply to actions to reorganize school districts for which the order to reorganize, pursuant to Section 35765, is appropriately filed after December 1, 2013, pursuant to Section 54902 of the Government Code. Actions to reorganize school districts for which the order to reorganize is appropriately filed on or before December 1, 2013, shall be implemented pursuant to Sections 35735 to 35736, inclusive, as those sections read on January 1, 2013.
